Massachusetts, session 194th, S1948.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 17A. Section 5N of chapter 59, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 16 and 43, the figure '$1,500' and inserting in place
thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- '$2,000'.
of 1